apertium-nob.nob.dix
<pardef n="sp/ørre__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>urt</l>       <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urt</l>       <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urte</l>      <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="nno-samsvarsbøying"><p><l>urt</l>      <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urte</l>      <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørrende</l>   <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ør</l>        <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørre</l>      <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørres</l>     <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urt</l>       <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ør</l>        <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørres</l>     <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urte</l>      <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ørring</l>        <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><j/>ing</r></p><par n="då__n"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ørrer</l>        <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><j/>er</r></p><par n="uer__n"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sp/ørre_no-cp__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>urt</l>       <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urt</l>       <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urte</l>      <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="nno-samsvarsbøying"><p><l>urt</l>      <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urte</l>      <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørrende</l>   <r>ørre<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ør</l>        <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørre</l>      <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørres</l>     <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urt</l>       <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ør</l>        <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørres</l>     <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urte</l>      <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ørring</l>        <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><j/>ing</r></p><par n="då__n"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ørrer</l>        <r>ørre<s n="vblex"/><j/>er</r></p><par n="uer__n"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="skamr/i__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>idd</l>        <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idd</l>        <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idde</l>       <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="nno-samsvarsbøying"><p><l>idd</l>       <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idde</l>       <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iende</l>      <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idd</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ir</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ei</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>iing</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><j/>ing</r></p><par n="då__n"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ier</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><j/>er</r></p><par n="uer__n"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gj/øre__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ort</l>       <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ort</l>       <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orte</l>      <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="nno-samsvarsbøying"><p><l>ort</l>      <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orte</l>      <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørende</l>    <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ør</l>        <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øre</l>       <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øres</l>      <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ort</l>       <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ør</l>        <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øres</l>      <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orde</l>      <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>øring</l>        <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><j/>ing</r></p><par n="då__n"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ører</l>        <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><j/>er</r></p><par n="uer__n"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gj/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ort</l>       <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ort</l>       <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orte</l>      <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="nno-samsvarsbøying"><p><l>ort</l>      <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orte</l>      <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørende</l>    <r>øre<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ør</l>        <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øre</l>       <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øres</l>      <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ort</l>       <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ør</l>        <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øres</l>      <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orde</l>      <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>øring</l>        <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><j/>ing</r></p><par n="då__n"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ører</l>        <r>øre<s n="vblex"/><j/>er</r></p><par n="uer__n"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="unnagjøre">       <i>unnagj</i><par n="gj/øre__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="spørre">          <i>sp</i><par n="sp/ørre__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="utgjøre">         <i>utgj</i><par n="gj/øre__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="frigjøre"><i>frigj</i><par n="gj/øre__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="latterliggjøre"><i>latterliggj</i><par n="gj/øre__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="nyttegjøre"><p><l>nyttegj</l><r>nyttiggj</r></p><par n="gj/øre__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rettferdiggjøre"><i>rettferdiggj</i><par n="gj/øre__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sprengri"><i>sprengr</i><par n="skamr/i__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="umenneskeliggjøre"><i>umenneskeliggj</i><par n="gj/øre__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="sannsynliggjøre"> <i>sannsynliggj</i><par n="gj/øre__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="lykksaliggjøre">  <i>lykksaliggj</i><par n="gj/øre__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skamri">          <i>skamr</i><par n="skamr/i__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forspørre">       <i>forsp</i><par n="sp/ørre__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="utspørre">        <i>utsp</i><par n="sp/ørre__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="menneskeliggjøre"><i>menneskeliggj</i><par n="gj/øre__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="rådspørre">       <i>rådsp</i><par n="sp/ørre__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kappri">          <i>kappr</i><par n="skamr/i__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="løsgjøre">        <i>løsgj</i><par n="gj/øre__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="overflødiggjøre"> <i>overflødiggj</i><par n="gj/øre__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilgodegjøre">    <i>tilgodegj</i><par n="gj/øre__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="etterspørre">     <i>ettersp</i><par n="sp/ørre__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="selvstendiggjøre"><i>selvstendiggj</i><par n="gj/øre__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="lausgjøre">       <i>lausgj</i><par n="gj/øre__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="ansvarliggjøre">	<i>ansvarliggj</i><par n="gj/øre__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="anskueliggjøre">         <i>anskueliggj</i><par n="gj/øre__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forespørre">             <i>foresp</i><par n="sp/ørre__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gjøre rede for">     <i>gj</i><par n="gj/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>rede<b/>for</ig></e>
<e lm="gjøre rent">               <i>gj</i><par n="gj/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>rent</ig></e>
<e lm="gjøre det av med">       <i>gj</i><par n="gj/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>det<b/>av<b/>med</ig></e>
<e lm="gjøre det bevisst">       <i>gj</i><par n="gj/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>det<b/>bevisst</ig></e>
<e lm="gjøre ferdig">    <i>gj</i><par n="gj/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>ferdig</ig></e>
<e lm="gjøre kur">               <i>gj</i><par n="gj/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>kur</ig></e>
<e lm="gjøre om">               <i>gj</i><par n="gj/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>om</ig></e>
<e lm="gjøre opprør">              <i>gj</i><par n="gj/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>opprør</ig></e>
<e lm="gjøre oppstyr">   <i>gj</i><par n="gj/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>oppstyr</ig></e>
<e lm="gjøre piketjeneste"><i>gj</i><par n="gj/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>piketjeneste</ig></e>
<e lm="gjøre seg bemerket">     <i>gj</i><par n="gj/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>seg<b/>bemerket</ig></e>
<e lm="gjøre seg til">           <i>gj</i><par n="gj/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>seg<b/>til</ig></e>
<e lm="gjøre spillopper"><i>gj</i><par n="gj/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>spillopper</ig></e>
<e lm="gjøre til">              <i>gj</i><par n="gj/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>til</ig></e>
<e lm="gjøre trollskap"> <i>gj</i><par n="gj/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>trollskap</ig></e>
<e lm="gjøre vondt">     <i>gj</i><par n="gj/øre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>ydmyk</ig></e>
<e lm="spørre etter">           <i>sp</i><par n="sp/ørre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>etter</ig></e>
<e lm="spørre seg for">         <i>sp</i><par n="sp/ørre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>seg<b/>for</ig></e>
<e lm="spørre seg selv">        <i>sp</i><par n="sp/ørre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>seg<b/>selv</ig></e>
<e lm="spørre som snarest"><i>sp</i><par n="sp/ørre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>som<b/>snarest</ig></e>
<e lm="spørre ut">              <i>sp</i><par n="sp/ørre_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>ut</ig></e>
